Hawaii, session 2026, HB2175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii residents pay the most for electricity of any state in the nation.  An average Hawaii electricity bill totals $213 each month.  The average rate of electricity, 39.62 cents per kWh, is more than twice the national average.  Federal programs such as the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program favor heat expenses, leaving Hawaii with less benefits than other states.  The purpose this Act is to implement a Hawaii Home Energy Assistance Program. SECTION 2.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-    Hawaii home energy assistance program; established.  (a) There is established within the department the Hawaii home energy assistance program.  The program shall assist eligible households with payment of costs associated with meeting an eligible household's home energy needs by providing a stipend of up to $50 per month, not to exceed $600 per year.  The amount of the stipend shall correlate to the income-based eligibility determinations established by the department pursuant to subsection (d). (b) Any person who is in need of public assistance may submit an application in a form prescribed by the department that includes, at a minimum, documentation to prove that the person: (1)  Is a resident of the State; (2)  Has an active energy utility account in the State; and (3)  Satisfies the income limit and all other eligibility standards established by the department pursuant to subsection (d). (c) The public utilities commission public benefits fee administrator, in consultation with the department, shall provide information and technical assistance about available energy efficiency programs to recipients, including an energy audit at the request of a recipient, and assist recipients with implementation of energy efficiency improvements in accordance with section 269-123(b). (d) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for purposes of this section relating to eligibility, assistance rates, and the application process." SECTION 3.  Section 269-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The public benefits fee administrator's duties and responsibilities shall be established by the public utilities commission by rule or order, and may include: (1)  Identifying, developing, administering, promoting, implementing, and evaluating programs, methods, and technologies that support energy-efficiency and demand-side management programs; (2)  Encouraging the continuance or improvement of efficiencies made in the production, delivery, and use of energy-efficiency and demand-side management programs and services; (3)  Using the energy-efficiency expertise and capabilities that have developed or may develop in the State and consulting with state agency experts; (4)  Promoting program initiatives, incentives, and market strategies that address the needs of persons facing the most significant barriers to participation; (5)  Promoting coordinated program delivery, including coordination with electric public utilities regarding the delivery of low-income home energy assistance, other demand-side management or energy-efficiency programs, and any utility programs; (6)  Consideration of innovative approaches to delivering demand-side management and energy-efficiency services, including strategies to encourage third-party financing and customer contributions to the cost of demand-side management and energy-efficiency services; (7)  Submitting, to the public utilities commission for review and approval, a multi-year budget and planning cycle that promotes program improvement, program stability, and maturation of programs and delivery resources; [and] (8)  Educating and training appliance manufacturers, distributors, and retailers of appliances covered under part VI of chapter 196 about the appliance efficiency standards established under that part to improve compliance[.]; and (9)  Providing information and technical assistance about available energy efficiency programs to recipients of the Hawaii home energy assistance program, including an energy audit if requested by the recipient, and assisting the recipients with implementation of energy efficiency improvements." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to: (1)  Establish      full-time equivalent (    FTE) position and      full-time equivalent (    FTE) temporary positions; (2)  Make system modifications; and (3)  Contract services as may be necessary, for the purposes of implementing the Hawaii home energy assistance program established pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________